District of Columbia statutes.
47-3206

Repealed

Washington Convention Center Authority Fund.

Repealed.

Mar. 16, 1978, D.C. Law 2-58, § 106, 24 DCR 5765
Aug. 14, 1982, D.C. Law 4-137, § 4, 29 DCR 2757
July 25, 1989, D.C. Law 8-17, § 10(b), 36 DCR 4160
Feb. 5, 1994, D.C. Law 10-68, § 49, 40 DCR 6311
Sept. 28, 1994, D.C. Law 10-188, § 304, 41 DCR 5333
Sept. 26, 1995, D.C. Law 11-52, § 115, 42 DCR 3684
Apr. 18, 1996, D.C. Law 11-110, § 58, 43 DCR 530
enacted, Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-254, § 2, 44 DCR 1575
Aug. 12, 1998, D.C. Law 12-142, § 3(i), 45 DCR 4826

Audit of accounts and operation of Authority: Section 305(a) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided that “on or before July 1 of each year, the District of Columbia Auditor, pursuant to the Auditor’s duties under § 47-117(b), shall audit the accounts and operation of the Authority and made a specific finding of the sufficiency of the projected revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to §§ 301, 302, 303, and 304 to meet the projected expenditures and reserve requirements of the Authority for the upcoming fiscal year.”

Section 305(b) of D.C. Law 10-188 provided: “If the audit conducted pursuant to subsection (a) of this section indicates that projected revenues from the taxes imposed pursuant to §§ 301, 302, 303, and 304 are insufficient to meet projected expenditures and reserve requirements of the Authority for the upcoming fiscal year, the Mayor shall impose a surtax, to become effective on or before October 1 of the upcoming year, on each of those taxes dedicated to the Authority excluding the tax on sales of restaurant meals and alcoholic beverages, in an amount equal to the pro rata share of the difference between (1) the sum of the projected expenditure and reserve requirements and (2) the projected revenues. The pro rata share shall be determined based on the pro rata estimated contribution of each tax to the total estimated tax revenue for the particular year as contained in the multiyear financial plan submitted pursuant to § 9-807(g) [§ 10-1202.06(g), 2001 Ed.].”

Section 6(b) of D.C. Law 4-137 provided that the provisions of the act shall take effect on the first day of the first month which begins more than 30 days after August 14, 1982, or on October 1, 1982, whichever is later.
1973 Ed., § 47-3106.
1981 Ed., § 47-3206.